Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
446

DEBT
ADJUSTING

Section

446-1 Definitions

446-2 Debt adjusting prohibited; penalty;
contracts void

446-3 Persons not affected

446-4 Certain loan functions not affected

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next